Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1098.
do enact as follows:SB1098,11Section 1. 66.0104 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB1098,2,2266.0104 (1) (am) “Lease” has the meaning given in s. 704.01 (1).SB1098,23Section 2. 66.0104 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB1098,2,6466.0104 (4) Notwithstanding sub. (2) (a) 3. and 4. and (d) 1., after the effective 5date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], a city, village, town, or county may 6enact an ordinance that does any of the following:SB1098,2,117(a) Requires a residential landlord to make a good faith offer to renew a 8tenant’s lease for a successive lease period unless there is good cause for 9nonrenewal, establishes standards for determining good cause for nonrenewal, and 10prescribes notice requirements related to an offer to renew a lease, including a 11prescribed timeframe for the offer and for a tenant’s response.SB1098,2,1312(b) Establishes requirements related to the execution of a lease agreement 13renewing a lease for a successive lease period.SB1098,2,1714(c) Prescribes a timeframe during which a residential landlord may enter a 15leased premises to show the premises to prospective tenants and a timeframe 16during which a residential landlord may enter into a lease agreement with another 17prospective tenant for a subsequent lease period.SB1098,2,2018(d) Provides a penalty or remedy for violation of the ordinance, including a 19private cause of action or requirement that the residential landlord pay relocation 20assistance to the tenant.SB1098,3,21(e) Provides that the ordinance’s provisions may not be waived in a lease 2agreement.SB1098,3,33